Georgia, session 2025_26, HB171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
- 1 -

LC 56 0412S
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Ensuring Accountability for Illegal AI
Activities Act."
SECTION 2.
Part 1 of Article 3 of Chapter 12 of Title 16 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to general provisions relative to obscenity and related offenses, is amended by
adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"16-12-80.1.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Artificial intelligence system' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
Section 17-10-22.
(2) 'Child' means any individual under the age of 16 years.
(3) 'Obscene' means material which meets the following requirements:
(A) To an average person, applying contemporary community standards, taken as a
whole, it predominantly appeals to the prurient interest, that is, a shameful or morbid
interest in nudity, sex, or excretion;
(B) The material taken as a whole lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific
value; and
(C) The material depicts or describes, in a patently offensive way, sexually explicit
conduct.
(4) 'Sexually explicit conduct' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code
Section 16-12-100.
(b) A person commits the offense of distribution of computer generated obscene material
depicting a child when such person knowingly distributes, solicits, or possesses with intent
to distribute a visual depiction of any kind, including an electronic image, electronic video,
drawing, sculpture, or painting, that:
- 2 -

LC 56 0412S
(1) Depicts an image that appears to be of a child, and that would appear realistic to an
average observer, engaging in sexually explicit conduct, whether alone or between
persons of the same or opposite sex;
(2) Is obscene; and
(3) Was created through the use of an artificial intelligence system.
(c) A person who owns or operates a computer program or application that is designed
primarily for use by or marketed to children, is accessible to the public, and which utilizes
an artificial intelligence system to generate text responses to user's prompts shall be guilty
of the offense of distribution of computer generated obscene material to a child if such
person knows or reasonably should have known that such computer program or application
was reasonably likely to and in fact did provide a description of obscene conduct to a child.
(d) A person who commits an offense under this Code section shall be guilty of a felony
and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year
nor more than 15 years.
(e) It shall not be a required element of an offense under this Code section that the image
of a child in such depiction is of a currently or previously living individual.
(f) If the sentence imposed under this Code section is probated, in whole or in part, by the
sentencing court, as a condition of such probation, the sentencing court shall have the
discretion to impose any or all of the requirements set forth in subsection (b) of Code
Section 42-8-35.
(g) For purposes of this Code section, a person who, in the course of processing or
producing visual or printed matter either privately or commercially, has reasonable cause
to believe that the visual or printed matter submitted for processing or producing depicts
what appears to be a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct shall immediately report
such incident, or cause a report to be made, to the National Center for Missing and
Exploited Children, and may additionally report such to the Georgia Bureau of
Investigation or the law enforcement agency for the county in which such matter is
- 3 -

LC 56 0412S
submitted. Any person participating in the making of a report or causing a report to be
made pursuant to this subsection or participating in any judicial proceeding or any other
proceeding resulting therefrom shall in so doing be immune from any civil or criminal
liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed, provided such participation pursuant
to this subsection is made in good faith.
(h) The provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section shall not apply to the activities
of law enforcement and prosecution agencies in the investigation and prosecution of
criminal offenses."
SECTION 3.
Article 1 of Chapter 10 of Title 17 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
procedure for sentencing and imposition of punishment, is amended by adding a new Code
section to read as follows:
"17-10-22.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Artificial intelligence system' means an engineered or machine based system that
emulates the capability of a person to receive audio, visual, text, or any other form of
information and use such information to emulate a human cognitive process, including,
but not limited to, learning, generalizing, reasoning, planning, predicting, acting, or
communicating; provided, however, that artificial intelligence systems may vary in the
forms of information they can receive and in the human cognitive processes they can
emulate.
(2) 'Designated offense' means:
(A) Stalking in violation of Code Section 16-5-90;
(B) Aggravated stalking in violation of Code Section 16-5-91;
(C) Exploitation of a disabled adult, elder person, or resident in violation of Code
Section 16-5-102;
- 4 -

LC 56 0412S
(D) Enticing a child for indecent purposes in violation of Code Section 16-6-5;
(E) Any misdemeanor or felony offense provided for in Article 1 of Chapter 8 of
Title 16;
(F) Any misdemeanor or felony offense provided for in Article 3 of Chapter 8 of
Title 16;
(G) Any misdemeanor or felony offense provided for in Article 5 of Chapter 8 of
100 Title 16;
101 (H) Any misdemeanor or felony offense provided for in Chapter 9 of Title 16;
102 (I) Any misdemeanor or felony offense provided for in Chapter 10 of Title 16;
103 (J) Any misdemeanor or felony offense provided for in Chapter 11 of Title 16;
104 (K) Any misdemeanor or felony offense provided for in Chapter 12 of Title 16; and
105 (L) Fraudulent election interference in violation of Code Section 21-2-604.
106 (3) 'Utilized an artificial intelligence system' means to be the proximate cause of an
107 artificial intelligence system receiving an input or providing an output.
108 (b) Subject to the notice requirement provided in subsection (c) of this Code section and
109 in enhancement of the penalty imposed, if the trier of fact determines beyond a reasonable
110 doubt that the defendant knowingly and intentionally utilized an artificial intelligence
111 system in the commission of a designated offense, the judge imposing sentence shall:
112 (1) If the designated offense for which the defendant was convicted is a misdemeanor,
113 impose a sentence of confinement for a period of not less than six nor more than 12
114 months and a fine not to exceed $5,000.00; or
115 (2) If the designated offense for which the defendant was convicted is a felony, impose
116 a sentence of imprisonment for a period of not less than two years and a fine not less than
117 $5,000.00; provided, however, that, if such designated offense is subject to a minimum
118 sentence of imprisonment for two years or more, the judge shall impose a sentence of
119 imprisonment for not less than such minimum sentence plus one year and a fine of not
120 less than $5,000.00.
- 5 -

LC 56 0412S
121 (c) At any time after the filing of an indictment or accusation, but not later than the
122 arraignment, the state shall notify the defendant of its intention to seek the enhanced
123 penalty or penalties authorized by subsection (b) of this Code section. Such notice shall
124 be in writing and shall allege the specific factor or factors authorizing an enhanced
125 sentence in the case pursuant to this Code section.
126 (d) The judge shall state when he or she imposes the sentence the amount of the
127 enhancement of the sentence based on the application of subsection (b) of this Code
128 section."
129 SECTION 4.
130 Titles 20 and 32 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to education and
131 highways, bridges, and ferries, respectively, are amended by replacing "16-12-80"
132 with "16-12-80.1" wherever the former term appears in:
133 (1) Code Section 20-2-324, relating to internet acceptable-use policies required in all
134 public schools, minimum policy requirements, policy enforcement, technology protection
135 measures required, policy compliance review, approval, and enforcement by State Board
136 of Education, and waivers prohibited;
137 (2) Code Section 20-5-5, relating to internet safety policies in public libraries;
138 (3) Code Section 32-6-75, relating to restrictions on outdoor advertising authorized by
139 Code Sections 32-6-72 and 32-6-73 and multiple message signs on interstate system,
140 primary highways, and other highways; and
141 (4) Code Section 32-6-75.3, relating to permits for trimming or removal of trees or
142 vegetation in state right of way which obstruct view of outdoor advertising and removal
143 of signs with lapsed permits.
- 6 -

LC 56 0412S
144 SECTION 5.
145 This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall apply to all offenses committed
146 on or after such date.
147 SECTION 6.
148 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 7 -